it: Altezza del collarino della scarpa: Alte; Basse; Medie; Altro
ru: Высота берца обуви: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое
cs: Výška límce boty: Vysoké (high-top); Nízké (low-top); Střední (mid-top); Jiné
nb: Høyde på skokragen: Høy; Lav; Middels høy; Annet
pt-PT: Altura da gola do sapato: Cano alto; Cano baixo; Cano médio; Outra
es: Aaltura del cuello del calzado: Caña alta; Caña baja; Caña media; Otro
fi: Kengän varren korkeus: Korkeavartinen; Matalavartinen; Keskikorkea varsi; Muu
fr: Hauteur de tige de la chaussure: Montante; Basse; Mi-montante; Autre
zh-TW: 鞋領高度: 高筒; 低筒; 中筒; 其他
en: Shoe collar height: High-top; Low-top; Mid-top; Other
nl: Schoenkraag hoogte: High-top; Low-top; Mid-top; Overig
hu: Cipőszár magassága: Magas szárú; Rövid szárú; Középmagas szárú; Egyéb
sk-SK: Výška členkovej časti obuvi: Vysoké; Nízke; Stredné; Iné
da: Skafthøjde for sko: High-top; Low-top; Mid-top; Andet
ko: 신발 칼라 높이: 하이탑; 로우탑; 미드탑; 기타
el: Ύψος κολάρου παπουτσιού: Ψηλό (High-top); Χαμηλό (Low-top); Μεσαίο (Mid-top); Άλλο
pl: Wysokość kołnierza cholewki: Wysokie; Niskie; Średnie; Inne
sl-SI: Višina roba čevlja: Visoke; Nizke; Srednje visoke; Drugo
ro-RO: Înălțimea gulerului pantofului: Înalți; Joși; Medii; Altele
vi: Chiều cao cổ giày: Cổ cao; Cổ thấp; Cổ lửng; Khác
lt-LT: Avalynės aulo aukštis: Aukštu auliuku; Žemu auliuku; Vidutinio auliuko; Kita
pt-BR: Calçado altura do colarinho: Cano alto; Cano baixo; Cano médio; Outros
tr: Ayakkabı bilek yüksekliği: Yüksek bilekli; Düşük bilekli; Orta bilekli; Diğer
de: Höhe des Schuhkragens: High-Top; Low-Top; Mid-Top; Sonstige
bg-BG: Височина на яката на обувката: Висока; Ниска; Средна; Друго
sv: Skokragens höjd: High-top; Low-top; Mid-top; Övrigt
hr-HR: Visina ovratnika cipele: Visoke; Niske; Srednje; Drugo
ja: シューズ履き口高さ: ハイトップ; ロートップ; ミッドトップ; その他
th: ความสูงของขอบรองเท้า: หุ้มข้อ; ข้อสั้น; หุ้มข้อปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 鞋帮高度: 高帮; 低帮; 中帮; 其他